New York, session 2025-2026, S3218.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The administrative code of the city of New York is amended 2 by adding a new section 26-418 to read as follows: 3 § 26-418 Surcharges for tenant-installed dishwashers; prohibited. The 4 imposition of any surcharge for the installation and use of a tenant-in- 5 stalled dishwasher is prohibited where the tenant pays for electric 6 utility service. 7 § 2. Section 6 of section 4 of chapter 576 of the laws of 1974, 8 constituting the emergency tenant protection act of nineteen seventy- 9 four, is amended by adding a new subdivision h to read as follows: 10 h. No owner of a housing accommodation subject to the provisions of 11 this section shall impose any surcharge for the installation and use of 12 a tenant-installed dishwasher where the tenant pays for electric utility 13 service. 14 § 3. Section 26-512 of the administrative code of the city of New York 15 is amended by adding a new subdivision h to read as follows: 16 h. No owner of a housing accommodation subject to the provisions of 17 this law shall impose any surcharge for the installation and use of a 18 tenant-installed dishwasher where the tenant pays for electric utility 19 service. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06911-01-5 S. 3218 2 1 § 4. Subdivision 4 of section 4 of chapter 274 of the laws of 1946, 2 constituting the emergency housing rent control law, is amended by 3 adding a new paragraph (h) to read as follows: 4 (h) No owner of a housing accommodation subject to the provisions of 5 this law shall impose any surcharge for the installation and use of a 6 tenant-installed dishwasher where the tenant pays for electric utility 7 service. 8 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately; provided that: (a) 9 section 26-418 of the city rent and rehabilitation law as added by 10 section one of this act shall remain in full force and effect only as 11 long as the public emergency requires the regulation and control of 12 residential rents and evictions continues, as provided in subdivision 3 13 of section 1 of the local emergency housing rent control act; and 14 (b) the amendments to section 26-512 of chapter 4 of title 26 of the 15 administrative code of the city of New York, made by section three of 16 this act shall expire on the same date as such law expires and shall not 17 affect the expiration of such law as provided under section 26-520 of 18 such law.